Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-173.02
Use of restrictive housing; director; report.

The director shall issue a report to the Governor and the Legislature no later than July 1, 2016. The report to the Legislature shall be issued electronically. The report shall contain a long-term plan for the use of restrictive housing with the explicit goal of reducing the use of restrictive housing.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 30.